tr: Koruyucu şortların kullanım amacı: ATV/UTV; BMX; Tepe inişi dağ bisikleti; Karting; Motokros/Enduro; Çoklu spor; Ralli/Oto yarışı (iç giyim); Kaykay/Snowboard (darbe emici şort); Kar motosikleti; Diğer
fi: Suojaavien shortsien käyttötarkoitus: ATV/UTV; BMX; Alamäkipyöräily; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Monilaji; Ralli/autourheilu (alusasu); Skeittaus/lumilautailu (iskushortsit); Moottorikelkkailu; Muu
lt-LT: Apsauginių šortų numatyta paskirtis: Keturračiai / UTV; BMX; Greitasis nusileidimas dviračiais; Kartingai; Motokrosas / Enduro; Įvairios sporto šakos; Ralis / automobilių sportas (apatiniai drabužiai); Riedlentės / snieglentės (nuo smūgių apsaugantys šortai); Sniego motociklai; Kita
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe zaščitnih kratkih hlač: Štirikolesnik (ATV/UTV); BMX; Gorsko kolesarjenje (downhill); Karting; Motokros/Enduro; Več športov; Reli/avtomobilske dirke (spodnje perilo); Rolkanje/deskanje (zaščitne hlače); Motorne sani; Drugo
nb: Beskyttende shorts – tiltenkt bruk: ATV/UTV; BMX; Utforsykling; Gokart; Motocross/enduro; Multisport; Rally / bilsport (undertøy); Skate/snowboard (støtshorts); Snøscooter; Annet
hr-HR: Namjeravana uporaba zaštitnih kratkih hlača: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill brdski biciklizam; Karting; Motokros/Enduro; Više sportova; Reli / auto-utrke (donje rublje); Skate/Snowboard (zaštitne hlačice); Motorne sanjke; Ostalo
pl: Zamierzone użycie spodenek ochronnych: ATV/UTV; BMX; Kolarstwo górskie zjazdowe (downhill); Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multisport; Rajdy / wyścigi samochodowe (bielizna); Deskorolka / snowboard (spodenki ochronne); Skuter śnieżny; Inne
el: Προορισμός χρήσης των προστατευτικών σορτς: ATV/UTV; BMX; Ορεινή ποδηλασία κατάβασης; Καρτ; Motocross/Enduro; Πολλαπλών αθλημάτων; Ράλι/Αγώνες αυτοκινήτου (εσώρουχο); Σκέιτ/Snowboard (σορτς προστασίας από κρούση); Snowmobile; Άλλο
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a pantalonilor scurți de protecție: ATV/UTV; BMX; Mountain biking downhill; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multisport; Raliu/Curse auto (lenjerie de corp); Skate/Snowboard (pantaloni scurți de impact); Snowmobil; Altele
zh-TW: 防護短褲預定用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; 下坡登山車; 卡丁車; 越野摩托車/耐力賽; 多重運動; 拉力賽/賽車 (內衣); 滑板/單板滑雪 (防摔短褲); 雪上摩托車; 其他
de: Vorgesehene Verwendung der Schutzshorts: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill-Mountainbiking; Kartsport; Motocross/Enduro; Multisport; Rallye/Autorennsport (Unterwäsche); Skaten/Snowboarden (Aufprallschutz-Shorts); Schneemobil; Sonstige
sk-SK: Určené použitie ochranných šortiek: Štvorkolky (ATV/UTV); BMX; Zjazdová horská cyklistika (Downhill); Motokáry; Motokros/Enduro; Multi-šport; Rely/automobilové preteky (spodná bielizeň); Skate/Snowboard (ochranné šortky proti nárazu); Snežné skútre; Iné
pt-PT: Utilização prevista dos calções de proteção: ATV/UTV; BMX; BTT de downhill; Karting; Motocross/enduro; Multidesporto; Rali/corridas de automóveis (roupa interior); Skate/snowboard (calções de impacto); Mota de neve; Outro
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af beskyttelsesshorts: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill-mountainbike; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multisport; Rally/bilsport (inderbeklædning); Skate/snowboard (impact-shorts); Snescooter; Andet
ja: 保護用ショーツの用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; ダウンヒルマウンテンバイク; カーティング; モトクロス/エンデューロ; マルチスポーツ; ラリー/カーレース (アンダーウェア); スケート/スノーボード (インパクトショーツ); スノーモービル; その他
sv: Avsedd användning för skyddsshorts: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill-cykling; Karting; Motocross/enduro; Multisport; Rally/bilsport (underkläder); Skateboard/snowboard (skyddsshorts); Snöskoter; Övrigt
es: Uso previsto de los pantalones cortos protectores: ATV/UTV; BMX; Ciclismo de montaña de descenso; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multideporte; Rally/Automovilismo (ropa interior); Skate/Snowboard (shorts de impacto); Motonieve; Otro
pt-BR: Shorts de proteção uso pretendido: ATV/UTV; BMX; Mountain bike downhill; Kart; Motocross/Enduro; Multiesportivo; Rali/automobilismo (roupa íntima); Skate/Snowboard (shorts de impacto); Snowmobile; Outro
ru: Назначение защитных шортов: ATV/UTV; BMX; Даунхилл; Картинг; Мотокросс/эндуро; Мультиспорт; Ралли/автоспорт (нижнее белье); Скейтбординг/сноубординг (защитные шорты); Снегоход; Другое
zh-CN: 防护短裤预期用途: ATV/UTV; BMX; 速降山地自行车; 卡丁车; 越野摩托车/耐力赛; 综合运动; 拉力赛/赛车（内衣）; 滑板/单板滑雪（防摔裤）; 雪地摩托; 其他
bg-BG: Предназначение на защитните шорти: ATV/UTV; BMX; Планинско колоездене (спускане); Картинг; Мотокрос/ендуро; Мултиспорт; Рали/автомобилни състезания (бельо); Скейт/сноуборд (удароустойчиви шорти); Моторна шейна; Друго
nl: Beschermshort beoogd gebruik: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill-mountainbiken; Karten; Motorcross/enduro; Multisport; Rally/autosport (onderkleding); Skate/snowboard (valbroeken); Sneeuwscooter; Overig
ko: 보호용 반바지의 용도: ATV/UTV; BMX; 다운힐 산악 자전거; 카트; 모토크로스/엔듀로; 멀티 스포츠; 랠리/자동차 경주(속옷); 스케이트/스노보드(충격 보호용 반바지); 스노모빌; 기타
en: Protective shorts intended use: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill mountain biking; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multi-sport; Rally/Auto racing (undergarment); Skate/Snowboard (impact shorts); Snowmobile; Other
fr: Usage prévu du short de protection: VTT/UTV; BMX; VTT de descente; Karting; Motocross/Enduro; Multisports; Rallye/Course automobile (sous-vêtement); Skate/Snowboard (short d’impact); Motoneige; Autre
cs: Zamýšlené použití ochranných šortek: ATV/UTV; BMX; Sjezdová horská cyklistika; Motokáry; Motokros/enduro; Multisportovní; Rallye / automobilové závody (spodní prádlo); Skate/snowboard (nárazové kraťasy); Sněžné skútry; Jiné
it: Uso previsto dei pantaloncini protettivi: ATV/UTV; BMX; Mountain bike downhill; Karting; Motocross/enduro; Multisport; Rally/automobilismo (abbigliamento intimo); Skate/snowboard (pantaloncini antiurto); Motoslitta; Altro
th: กางเกงขาสั้นป้องกันที่ออกแบบมาเพื่อการใช้งาน: ATV/UTV; BMX; ปั่นจักรยานเสือภูเขาดาวน์ฮิลล์; รถคาร์ท; โมโตครอส/เอ็นดูโร่; กีฬาหลายประเภท; แรลลี่/แข่งรถ (ชุดชั้นใน); สเกต/สโนว์บอร์ด (กางเกงกันกระแทก); สโนว์โมบิล; อื่นๆ
hu: Védőnadrág tervezett felhasználása: ATV/UTV; BMX; Downhill hegyikerékpározás; Gokart; Motokrossz/Enduro; Multisport; Rali/Autóversenyzés (alsóruházat); Gördeszka/Snowboard (ütődésvédő nadrág); Motoros szán; Egyéb
vi: Quần bảo hộ dùng cho mục đích sử dụng: ATV/UTV; BMX; Đạp xe leo núi đổ đèo; Đua xe kart; Motocross/Enduro; Đa môn thể thao; Đua xe rally/ô tô (đồ lót); Trượt ván/Trượt tuyết (quần đùi chống va đập); Xe trượt tuyết; Khác